Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 2 Exercise by Counties of Power to Contract Generally

32-4-60.
“Contract” defined.

As used in this part, the term “contract” means a contract or subcontract entered into by a county with any person, with the state or federal government or an agency of either, with another county or counties, with a municipality or municipalities, or with any combination of the foregoing entities for the construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of all or part of a public road, including but not limited to a contract for the purchase of materials, for the hiring of labor, for professional services, or for other things or services incident to such work.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-816, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Law reviews.

For survey article on construction law for the period from June 1, 2002 through May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 85 (2003).

32-4-61.
Authority of county to contract; form of contracts; approval of contracts by resolution.

A county shall have the authority to contract as set forth in this part and in paragraph (1) of Code Section 32-4-42. Any contract for work on all or part of the county road system shall be in writing and shall be approved by resolution which shall be entered on the minutes of such county.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-817, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-62.
Contracts with state, state agencies, adjoining counties, and incorporated municipalities of county.

Subject to the limitations of this Code section, in addition to the authority to contract with a private contractor, a county may enter into a contract with the state, a state agency, another county or municipality, or with any combination or number of the foregoing entities for work on any public road system of Georgia.

Such a contract with a state agency is subject to the limitations of Code Section 32-2-61, including the cost of the negotiated contract, and the right of the department to supervise performance of the contract.

A county shall have authority to enter into a contract with adjoining counties for the joint work on a road constituting a part of the county road system of those counties which are parties to such contract.

A county shall have the authority provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 32-4-112 to contract with a municipality and expend funds for work on public roads within a municipality in the county.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-818, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Cross references.

Provision that county treasurer or other county official shall not receive commission on funds received or disbursed in connection with county contracts with Department of Transportation for construction or repair of roads, §

36-6-13

.

32-4-63.
Limitations on power to contract; at least two estimates required for certain expenditures.

A county is prohibited from negotiating a contract except a contract:

Involving the expenditure of less than $200,000.00;

With a state agency or county or municipality with which a county is authorized to contract in accordance with the provisions of Code Sections 32-4-61 and 32-4-62;

For the purchase of those materials, supplies, and equipment necessary for the county’s construction and maintenance of its public roads and for the support and maintenance of the county’s forces used in such work, as authorized by Chapter 91 of Title 36;

Subject to Article 6 of Chapter 6 of this title, with a railroad or railway company or a publicly or privately owned utility concerning relocation of its line, tracks, or facilities where the same are not then located in a public road and such relocation or grade-crossing elimination is necessary as an incident to the construction of a new public road or to the reconstruction or maintenance of an existing public road. Nothing contained in this paragraph shall be construed as requiring a county to furnish a site or right of way for railroad or railway lines or tracks of public utility facilities required to be removed from a public road;

For engineering or other kinds of professional or specialized services;

For emergency maintenance requiring immediate repairs to a public road, including but not limited to bridge repairs, snow and ice removal, and repairs due to flood conditions;

Otherwise expressly authorized by law; or

That is a design-build contract as provided for in Code Section 32-4-74.

No contract involving an expenditure of more than $20,000.00 but less than $200,000.00 shall be awarded under this Code section without the submission of at least two estimates.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-819, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 356, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 9; Ga. L. 2014, p. 851, § 3/HB 774; Ga. L. 2022, p. 678, § 1/SB 586.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “or” from the end of paragraph (a)(6), substituted “; or” for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(7), and added paragraph (a)(8).

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004).

32-4-64.
Required letting of contracts by public bid.

Except as authorized by Code Section 32-4-63, all contracts shall be let by public bid.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-820, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-65.
Advertising for bids.

Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 91 of Title 36 and of any other provision of law to the contrary, on all contracts to be let by public bid a county shall advertise for competitive sealed bids for at least two weeks. The public advertisement shall be inserted once a week for two weeks in such newspaper wherein the county sheriff’s sales are advertised or in such other newspapers or publications, or both, as will ensure adequate publicity, the first insertion to be two weeks prior to the opening of the sealed bids, the second to follow one week after the publication of the first insertion.

Such advertisement shall include but not be limited to the following:

A description sufficient to enable the public to know the approximate extent and character of the work to be done;

The time allowed for performance;

The terms and time of payment;

Where and under what conditions and costs the detailed plans and specifications and proposal forms may be obtained;

The amount of the proposal guaranty, if one is required;

The time and place for submission and opening of bids;

The right of the county to reject any one or all bids; and

Such further notice as the county may deem advisable as in the public interest.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-821, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 10.

32-4-66.
Payment by bidder to cover costs.

A county may require each bidder to pay a reasonable sum sufficient to cover the cost to the county, where applicable, of the bid proposal form, the contract, and its specifications.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-822, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-67.
Proposal guaranty by bidder.

No bid, other than a bid solely for engineering or other kinds of professional services, will be considered by a county unless it is accompanied by a proposal guaranty in the form of a certified check or other acceptable security payable to the county for an amount deemed by the county in the public interest necessary to ensure that the successful bidder will execute the contract on which he bid.

A proposal guaranty will be returned to a bidder upon receipt by the county of the bidder’s written withdrawal of his bid if such receipt is before the time scheduled for the opening of bids. Upon the determination by a county of the lowest reliable bidder, the county will return the proposal guaranties to all bidders except that of the lowest reliable bidder. If no contract award is made within 30 days after the date set for the opening of bids, all bids shall be rejected and all proposal guaranties shall be returned unless the county and the successful bidder agree in writing to a longer period of time.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-823, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 167, § 3/HB 192.

32-4-68.
Award of contract to lowest reliable bidder; procedure upon rejection of bids.

Where a contract has been let for bid, the county, by resolution entered in its minutes, shall award the contract to the lowest reliable bidder, provided that the county shall have the right to reject any and all such bids whether such right is reserved in the public notice or not and, in such case, may readvertise, perform the work itself, or abandon the project.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 37, § 1c; Code 1933, § 95-1105; Code 1933, § 95A-824, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-69.
Bonds of successful bidder generally.

Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 91 of Title 36 to the contrary, when the price of a contract let to bid, other than a contract solely for engineering or other kinds of professional services, is $5,000.00 or more, no contract of a county shall be valid unless the contractor first gives:

A performance bond that meets the requirements established in Parts 1 and 3 of Article 3 of Chapter 91 of Title 36 in the amount of the bid, with one good and solvent surety, for the faithful performance of the contract and to indemnify the county for any damages occasioned by a failure to perform the same within the prescribed time;

A payment bond that meets the requirements established in Parts 1 and 4 of Article 3 of Chapter 91 of Title 36; and

Such other bonds required by the county in its advertisement for bids, including but not limited to public liability and property damage insurance bonds.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 37, § 1b; Code 1933, § 95-1104; Code 1933, § 95A-825, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 11; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 4; Ga. L. 2007, p. 167, § 4/HB 192.

32-4-70.
Bridge repair bonds.

As used in this Code section, the term “bridge” shall include the approaches to such bridge within 50 feet of either end except when the bridge itself measures 100 feet or more, in which case the term “bridge” shall include the approaches within 100 feet of either end of the bridge.

Where the contract relates to the construction or reconstruction of all or a part of a bridge, the county or counties affected may require the successful contractor to add to the conditions of the performance bond required under paragraph (1) of Code Section 32-4-69 the following condition: to keep the bridge in good condition for a period of not less than seven years.

History.

Laws 1888, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 39; Code 1863, § 649; Code 1868, § 711; Code 1873, § 671; Code 1882, § 671; Civil Code 1895, § 603; Civil Code 1910, § 748; Code 1933, § 95-1001; Code 1933, § 95A-826, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Cross references.

Authority of counties to erect bridges across navigable streams, T. 36, C. 14.

32-4-71.
Failure to take bonds; liability of county.

If the payment bond required by paragraph (2) of Code Section 32-4-69 is not taken, the county shall be liable to subcontractors, laborers, materialmen, and other persons, as provided in Part 4 of Article 3 of Chapter 91 of Title 36, for losses to them resulting from failure to take such bond.

If the condition of bridge repair authorized by Code Section 32-4-70 to be added to the performance bond is not taken, the contracting county or counties shall be primarily liable for all injuries caused by reason of any defective bridge for damages occurring within seven years of the contractor’s work on the bridge and its acceptance by the county or counties, provided that the county shall be discharged from all liability upon the inclusion in the performance bond of the aforesaid bridge repair condition.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to impose personal liability on the county governing authority.

History.

Laws 1888, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 39; Code 1863, § 669; Code 1868, § 731; Code 1873, § 691; Code 1882, § 691; Civil Code 1895, § 603; Civil Code 1910, § 748; Code 1933, § 95-1001; Code 1933, § 95A-827, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 12; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 5.

32-4-72.
Failure of successful bidder to sign contract or furnish bonds.

If the successful bidder fails to sign the contract or furnish the bonds required under authority of Code Section 32-4-71, his proposal guaranty, if one had been required by the county, will become the property of the county as liquidated damages. The contract then may be readvertised, performed with county forces, or the project abandoned.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-828, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-73.
Oath by successful bidder.

A successful bidder, before commencing the work, shall execute a written oath, as required by subsection (e) of Code Section 36-91-21, stating that he or she has not violated such Code section, which makes it unlawful to restrict competitive bidding.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-829, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 13; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 6.

32-4-74.
Design-build procedure.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Design-build procedure” means a method of contracting under which a county contracts with another party that will both design and build the structures, facilities, systems, and other items specified in the contract.

“Project” means a transportation related undertaking which provides a public benefit.

A county may use the design-build procedure for projects that include buildings, bridges and approaches, rail corridors, technology deployments, and limited or controlled access projects or projects that may be constructed within existing rights of way where the scope of work can be clearly defined or when a significant savings in project delivery time can be attained.

When a county determines that it is in the best interests of the public, a county may combine any or all of the environmental services, utility relocation services, right of way services, design services, and construction phases of a public road or other project into a single contract using a design-build procedure. Design-build contracts may be advertised and awarded notwithstanding the requirements of Code Section 32-4-63; provided, however, that construction activities shall not begin on any portion of such project until title to the necessary rights of way and easements for the construction of that portion of the project has vested in the county and all railroad crossing and utility agreements have been executed.

A county shall adopt by resolution procedures for administering design-build contracts. Such procedures shall include, but not be limited to:

Prequalification requirements;

Public advertisement procedures;

Request for qualification requirements;

Request for proposal requirements;

Criteria for evaluating technical information and project costs;

Criteria for selection and award process, provided that the resolution shall specify that the criteria for selection shall consist of the following minimum two components for any two-step procurement process:

A statement of qualifications from which a county will determine a list of qualified firms for the project, provided that, if a county determines it is in the county’s best interest, it may omit this requirement and move directly to a one-step procurement process through the issuance of a request for proposal from which a county may select the lowest qualified bidder; and

From the list of qualified firms as provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a technical proposal and a price proposal from each firm from which a county shall select the lowest qualified bidder or, in the event a county uses the best value procurement process, the request for proposal shall specify the requirements necessary for the selection of the best value proposal which shall include, at a minimum, a weighted cost component and a technical component. A proposal shall only be considered nonresponsive if it does not contain all the information and level of detail requested in the request for proposal. A proposal shall not be deemed to be nonresponsive solely on the basis of minor irregularities in the proposal that do not directly affect the ability to fairly evaluate the merits of the proposal. Notwithstanding the requirements of Code Section 36-91-21, under no circumstances shall a county use a “best and final offer” standard in awarding a contract in order to induce one proposer to bid against an offer of another proposer. A county may provide for a stipulated fee to be awarded to the short list of qualified firms that provide a responsive, successful proposal. In consideration for paying the stipulated fee, a county may use any ideas or information contained in the proposals in connection with the contract awarded for the project, or in connection with a subsequent procurement, without obligation to pay any additional compensation to the unsuccessful proposers;

Identification of those projects that a county believes are candidates for design-build contracting; and

Criteria for resolution of contract issues. A county may adopt a method for resolving issues and disputes through negotiations at the project level by the program manager up to and including a dispute review board procedure. Regardless of the status or disposition of the issue or dispute, the design-builder and a county shall continue to perform their contractual responsibilities. This paragraph shall not prevent an aggrieved party from seeking judicial review.

In contracting for design-build projects, a county shall be limited to contracting for no more than 50 percent of the total amount of construction projects awarded in the previous fiscal year.

Any firm selected for a design-build project shall self-perform at least 30 percent of the project.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-4-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 678, § 2/SB 586.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 678, § 2/SB 586, effective July 1, 2022, redesignated former Code Section 32-4-74 as present Code Section 32-4-75.

32-4-75.
Applicability of other laws to this part.

Except as indicated to the contrary in this part, Chapter 91 of Title 36 shall not apply to this part.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-830, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, §
1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, §
14; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, §
32; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, §
7; Code 1981, §

32-4-75

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2022, p. 678, § 2/SB 586.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, redesignated former Code Section 32-4-74 as this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 32, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 7. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).